apertium-nhw.nhw.lexc
LEXICON TAM-Clase2-a

%<pres%>:a Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>:a%>j Agr-Pl-Nonpast ; ! TODO: flag diacritics for plural subj
%<pret%>:0 Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<pret%>:%>kej Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<impf%>:a%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<impf%>:a%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<fut%>:a%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
a%>s Neki-Aux ;
%<fut%>:a%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>%<dur%>:%>to%>k Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>%<dur%>:%>to%>k%>ej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<impf%>%<dur%>:%>to%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<impf%>%<dur%>:%>to%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<fut%>%<dur%>:%>to%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<fut%>%<dur%>:%>to%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;

%<opt%>:a%> Agr-Sg-Opt ;
%<opt%>:a%>kan Agr-Pl-Opt ;

SufijoAuxiliar ;

LEXICON TAM-Clase2-i
%<pres%>:i Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>:i%>j Agr-Pl-Nonpast ; ! TODO: flag diacritics for plural subj
%<pret%>:0 Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<pret%>:%>kej Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<impf%>:i%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<impf%>:i%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<fut%>:i%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
i%>s Neki-Aux ;
%<fut%>:i%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>%<dur%>:%>to%>k Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>%<dur%>:%>to%>k%>ej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<impf%>%<dur%>:%>to%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<impf%>%<dur%>:%>to%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<fut%>%<dur%>:%>to%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<fut%>%<dur%>:%>to%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;

%<opt%>:i%> Agr-Sg-Opt ;
%<opt%>:i%>kan Agr-Pl-Opt ;

SufijoAuxiliar ;


LEXICON TAM-Clase3
%<pres%>:a Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>:a%>j Agr-Pl-Nonpast ; ! TODO: flag diacritics for plural subj
%<pret%>:0 Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<pret%>:j Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<pret%>:j%>kej Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<impf%>:a%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<impf%>:a%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<fut%>:%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
:%>s Neki-Aux ;
%<fut%>:%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>k Agr-Sg-Nonpast;
%<pres%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>k%>ej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<impf%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<impf%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<fut%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<fut%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;

%<opt%>:%> Agr-Sg-Opt ;
%<opt%>:%>kan Agr-Pl-Opt ;


SufijoAuxiliar ;


LEXICON TAM-Clase4
%<pres%>:0 Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>:%>j Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<pret%>: Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<pret%>:%>j%>kej Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<impf%>:%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<impf%>:%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<fut%>:%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%>s Neki-Aux ;
%<fut%>:%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>k Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<impf%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<impf%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<fut%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<fut%>%<dur%>:j%>to%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;

%<opt%>:%> Agr-Sg-Opt ;
%<opt%>:%>kan Agr-Pl-Opt ;

SufijoAuxiliar ;

LEXICON SufijoAuxiliar
Tinemi-Aux ;
Tijtia-Aux ;
Tiuits-Aux ;
Purposive ;

LEXICON Tinemi-Aux
%<aux%>%<pres%>%+nemi:%>ti%>nemi Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<impf%>:%>ti%>nemi%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<aux%>%<impf%>:%>ti%>nemi%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>:%>ti%>nemi%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>:%>ti%>nemi%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<pres%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>nen%>to%>k Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<impf%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>nen%>to%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<aux%>%<impf%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>nen%>to%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>nen%>to%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>nen%>to%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;

LEXICON Tijtia-Aux
%<aux%>%<pres%>:%>ti%>jtia Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<pres%>:%>ti%>jtia%>j Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<impf%>:%>ti%>jtia%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<aux%>%<impf%>:%>ti%>jtia%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>:%>ti%>jti%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>:%>ti%>jti%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<pres%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>jti%>to%>k Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<impf%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>jti%>to%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<aux%>%<impf%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>jti%>to%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>jti%>to%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>%<fut%>%<dur%>:%>ti%>jti%>to%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;

LEXICON Tiuits-Aux
%<aux%>%<pres%>:%>ti%>uits Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
! TODO: figure out the rest of these (TAM)

LEXICON Neki-Aux
%<aux%>+neki:%>neki Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<aux%>+neki:%>neki%>j Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;


LEXICON IV-Raiz

palti%<iv%>:palti          TAM-Clase1 ; ! "mojarse"

! TODO: make clase1-a and clase1-i
panoa%<iv%>:pano            TAM-panoa ; ! "pasar/suceder"


nejnemi%<iv%>:nejne%{M%}   TAM-Clase2-i ;
kochi%<iv%>:koch           TAM-Clase2-i ;
kalaki%<iv%>:kalak         TAM-Clase2-i ;
uetsi%<iv%>:uets           TAM-Clase2-i ;
miki%<iv%>:mik             TAM-Clase2-i ;
patlani%<iv%>:patlan       TAM-Clase2-i ;
nemi%<iv%>:ne%{m%}         TAM-Clase2-i ;
kisa%<iv%>:kis		   TAM-Clase2-a ;


kualtia%<iv%>:kualti	   TAM-Clase3 ; ! "servir/estar bueno/no pudrido"
tlajtoa%<iv%>:tlajto	   TAM-Clase3 ; ! "hablar"
chantia%<iv%>:chanti	   TAM-Clase3 ; ! "vivir"


ueli%<iv%>:ueli		   TAM-Clase4 ;


LEXICON TV-Raiz

panoa%<tv%>:pano            TAM-panoa ; ! "pasar (a alguien/algo)"


kua%<tv%>:kua		       TAM-Clase4 ; ! "consumir/comer"

paleuia%<tv%>:paleui	   TAM-Clase3 ; ! "ayudar"
paktia%<tv%>:pakti	       TAM-Clase3 ; ! "hacer feliz / gustar"
ijtoa%<tv%>:ijto           TAM-Clase3   ; ! "decir"
tlalia%<tv%>:tlali	       TAM-Clase3 ; ! "poner 
machtia%<tv%>:machti	   TAM-Clase3 ; ! "enseñar/hacer saber"
nankilia%<n%>:nankili      TAM-Clase3 ; ! "contestar"

chiua%<tv%>:chiu           TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "hacer"
kaua%<tv%>:kau             TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "dejar"
koua%<tv%>:kou             TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "comprar"

kuepa%<tv%>:kuep           TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "voltear"

chipaua%<tv%>:chipau	   TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "limpiar"
xipeua%<tv%>:xipeu	       TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "pelar"
paka%<tv%>:pak		       TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "lavar"
piya%<tv%>:pi%{y%}	       TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "tener"

kaki%<tv%>:kak             TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "escuchar"
mati%<tv%>:mat             TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "saber"
teki%<tv%>:tek             TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "cortar"
tejteki%<tv%>:tejtek       TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "cortar varias veces"
neki%<tv%>:nek             TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "querer"

namaka%<tv%>:namaka	       TAM-Clase1 ; ! "vender s.t."
tlasojtla%<tv%>:tlasojtla  TAM-Clase1 ; ! "amar"
ita%<tv%>:it		       TAM-Clase1-ita ; !"ver"


LEXICON DV-Raiz
maka%<tv2%>:maka       	   TAM-Clase1 ; ! "dar"
ilia%<tv2%>:ili	   TAM-Clase3 ; ! "decir"
